Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.130

State health care authority administrative account—School employees' insurance administrative account.

(1) The state health care authority administrative account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under RCW 43.79.270, may be spent only after appropriation by statute, and may be used only for operating expenses of the authority.

(2) The school employees' insurance administrative account is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be used for operating, contracting, and other administrative expenses of the authority in administration of the school employees insurance program, including reimbursement of the state health care authority administrative account for initial operating expenses of the authority associated with chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

[ 2023 c 51 s 13; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 810; 2014 c 221 s 914; 1988 c 107 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Effective date—2014 c 221: See note following RCW 28A.710.260.